Hawaii statutes.
§304A-704 Rules governing Hawaii educator
loan program revolving fund. The university may adopt rules to implement
the Hawaii educator loan program. The rules shall be adopted pursuant to
chapter 91 but shall be exempt from the public notice and public hearing
requirements. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2; am L 2015, c 106, §5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next